Udmurt.aff
SFX d Y 600 		# для неодушевленных
SFX d 0 э [дзлнсту]  #ед.ч.
SFX d 0 е [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь е ь
SFX d й е й
SFX d 0 эд [дзлнсту] 
SFX d 0 ед [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь ед ь
SFX d й ед й 
SFX d 0 эз [дзлнсту]  
SFX d 0 ез [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь ез ь
SFX d й ез й
SFX d 0 мы .
SFX d 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 ме . #1лицо	 вин.п.
SFX d 0 мес . 
SFX d 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #2л.
SFX d 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX d 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь 
SFX d 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь 
SFX d 0 лэн . 		#род.п.
SFX d 0 элэн [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдлэн [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзлэн [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 елэн [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едлэн [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езлэн [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь елэн ь
SFX d й елэн й
SFX d ь едлэн ь
SFX d й едлэн й
SFX d ь езлэн ь
SFX d й езлэн й
SFX d 0 мылэн .
SFX d 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX d 0 элэсь [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдлэсь [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзлэсь [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 елэсь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едлэсь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езлэсь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь елэсь ь
SFX d й елэсь й
SFX d ь едлэсь ь
SFX d й едлэсь й
SFX d ь езлэсь ь
SFX d й езлэсь й
SFX d 0 мылэсь .
SFX d 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX d 0 элы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдлы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзлы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 елы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едлы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езлы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь елы ь
SFX d й елы й
SFX d ь едлы ь
SFX d й едлы й
SFX d ь езлы ь
SFX d й езлы й
SFX d 0 мылы .
SFX d 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX d 0 этэк [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдтэк [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзтэк [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 етэк [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едтэк [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езтэк [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь етэк ь
SFX d й етэк й
SFX d ь едтэк ь
SFX d й едтэк й
SFX d ь езтэк ь
SFX d й езтэк й
SFX d 0 мытэк .
SFX d 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX d 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX d 0 эя [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдъя [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзъя [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 ея [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едъя [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езъя [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь ея ь
SFX d й ея й
SFX d ь едъя ь
SFX d й едъя й
SFX d ь езъя ь
SFX d й езъя й
SFX d 0 мыя .
SFX d 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 эн [дзлнсту] #твор.п.
SFX d 0 ен [^дзлнстуь]
SFX d ь ен ь
SFX d й ен й
SFX d 0 эным [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эныд [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эныз [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 еным [^дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 еныд [^дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 еныз [^дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 энымы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эныды [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 энызы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 енымы [^дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 еныды [^дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 енызы [^дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 ын .		#местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX d 0 ам [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё] 
SFX d 0 амы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё] 
SFX d 0 ад [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 ады [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 аз [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 азы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 ям [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 ямы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 яд [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 яды [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 яз [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d 0 язы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX d ь ям ь
SFX d й ям й
SFX d ь ямы ь
SFX d й ямы й
SFX d ь яд ь
SFX d й яд й
SFX d ь яды ь
SFX d й яды й
SFX d ь яз ь
SFX d й яз й
SFX d ь язы ь
SFX d й язы й
SFX d 0 ысь . #исходн.п.
SFX d 0 ысьтым .
SFX d 0 ысьтымы .
SFX d 0 ысьтыд .
SFX d 0 ысьтыды .
SFX d 0 ысьтыз .
SFX d 0 ысьтызы .
SFX d 0 ысен . #отдал.п.
SFX d 0 ысеным .
SFX d 0 ысенымы .
SFX d 0 ысеныд .
SFX d 0 ысеныды .
SFX d 0 ысеныз .
SFX d 0 ысенызы .
SFX d 0 этӥ [дзлнсту] #перех.п. 
SFX d 0 этӥм [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 этӥмы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 этӥд [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 этӥды [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 этӥз [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 этӥзы [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 етӥ [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 етӥм [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 етӥмы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 етӥд [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 етӥды [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 етӥз [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 етӥзы [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь етӥ ь
SFX d й етӥ й
SFX d ь етӥм ь
SFX d й етӥм й
SFX d ь етӥмы ь
SFX d й етӥмы й
SFX d ь етӥд ь
SFX d й етӥд й
SFX d ь етӥды ь
SFX d й етӥды й
SFX d ь етӥз ь
SFX d й етӥз й
SFX d ь етӥзы ь
SFX d й етӥзы й
SFX d 0 тӥ . 
SFX d 0 тӥм .
SFX d 0 тӥмы .
SFX d 0 тӥд .
SFX d 0 тӥды .
SFX d 0 тӥз .
SFX d 0 тӥзы .
SFX d 0 лань . #направ.п.
SFX d 0 элань [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдлань [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзлань [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 елань [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едлань [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езлань [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь елань ь
SFX d й елань й
SFX d ь едлань ь
SFX d й едлань й
SFX d ь езлань ь
SFX d й езлань й
SFX d 0 мылань .
SFX d 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX d 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX d 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX d 0 озь [^ь] #предельн.п.
SFX d ь ёзь [ь]
SFX d 0 эозь [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эдозь [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 эзозь [дзлнсту]
SFX d 0 еозь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 едозь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d 0 езозь [^дзлнстьйу]
SFX d ь еозь ь
SFX d й еозь й
SFX d ь едозь ь
SFX d й едозь й
SFX d ь езозь ь
SFX d й езозь й
SFX d 0 озям .
SFX d 0 озяд .
SFX d 0 озяз .
SFX d 0 мыозь .
SFX d 0 дыозь .
SFX d 0 зыозь .
SFX d 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX d 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX d 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсмес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёстэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёссэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёссэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 осме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осмес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 остэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 остэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 оссэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 оссэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 ёсме [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёсмес [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёстэ [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёстэс [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёссэ [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ёссэс [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёслэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # род.п.
SFX d 0 ослэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 ёслэн [ьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсыдлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсызлэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёсмылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёстылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 ъёссылэн [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX d 0 осылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осыдлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осызлэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX d 0 осмылэн [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
