Udmurt.dic
кузьым/d
абрис/d
австриец/d
агентство/d
аджарка/d
адрестон/d
азгынлык/d
азран/dp
азьдоринскон/d
азьпал/pd
ай-вын/d
акваланг/d
актэмъяськон/d
алвыл/d
алкоголизм/d
альтон/d
амбразура/d
аналтэм/d
аномали/d
апартеид/d
арантӥ/d
арка/d
аспалтылон/d
атыкей/d
бабыльтӥськем/d
байракъёс/d
бамйыл/d
баскетбол/d
беглоян/d
бельмо/d
берпумпу/d
биётака/d
бисквит/d
бодыяськылон/d
борӟаськон/d
бӧтьыран/d
бугортӥськылон/d
буйвол/d
бумазей/dp
буртчин/dp
бушомытон/d
быдэнтон/d
бырдаллян/d
бышкан/d
вайгес/pd
валиськем/d
ваментӥр/d
вапум/d
ватскытон/d
векчиёмытылон/d
вераяськон/d
веха/d
визьматылон/d
вирема/d
виштыяськон/d
вожвайылон/d
возъяськон/d
вольтчытон/d
ворин/d
вотсан/d
вӧли/d
ву/dp
вузкарылон/d
вунылон/d
вутскись/d
выжан/d
вылон/d
вырӟем/d
га/d
гайтан/d
гвардия/d
герӟаськыл/d
гижлояськон/d
гогы/d
голец/d
гоп/d
горшокныр/d
графа/d
гудӟон/d
гумыяллян/d
гурӵужон/d
гылскылон/d
гырон-кизён/d
дару/dp
декада/d
диабет/d
дӥсьтонлык/d
домбыртон/d
друг/d
дунтэммон/d
духовой-оркестр/d
дыроп/d
дэра/dp
емышан/d
ёмыръян/d
жагмытылон/d
желудок/d
жобок/dp
ӝажы/d
ӝожомон/d
ӝуатэм/d
ӝуштэм/d
задача/d
запасаллян/d
зигзаг/d
золъятон/d
зугыръяськон/d
зымылон/d
ӟагара/d
ӟечбураськон/d
ӟимаськон/d
ӟузем/d
ӟыгырталтэс/d
избур/d
изъянмон/d
ингушка/d
интернационализм/d
исатон/d
ишан-дышмон/d
йӧлнянь/d
йыбырттытон/d
йылылон/d
йыркыл/d
йыръям/d
казылык/d
калпак/d
камчабак/d
каплама/d
карась/dp
карта/d
католик/d
кебит/dp
келиськем/d
кенжытӥськон/d
керпотылон/d
кечсин/d
кизератон/d
кимберлит/d
кирдон/d
кись/d
киыл/d
князь/d
кокрок/d
коллёву/d
коми-пермяк/dp
конгресс/d
конь/d
коралл/d
коробан/d
космополитизм/d
котыртылон/d
кӧжы/dp
кӧсвакыт/d
кӧтулкыскон/d
кремень/dp
куазь/d
куар/d
куатланон/d
кужекъятон/d
кузьыткуаръёс/d
кукым/d
кулэсъяськон/d
кунулскон/d
курегатас/d
курс/d
кусуласькон/d
кутэт/d
кушман-сяртчы/d
кыжмон/d
кылбуран/d
кылнулдон/d
кыман/d
кырем/d
кырыжомылон/d
кыткылон/d
лабыртон/d
лампазей/d
ларгетылон/d
лекаськон/d
лесничо/d
лидер/d
лицензия/d
лопыръяськон/d
лӧтсатон/d
лулъян/d
лыдӟиськытон/d
лысон/d
лэсьтӥськылон/d
люктаськон/d
магистраль/d
майыгам/d
мамыкӟытон/d
маскаръяськылон/d
маяллян/d
мелиораци/d
мертчон/d
мешок/d
мискиньяськон/d
модница/d
мордва/d
мрамор/dp
мукабан/d
мурӧс/d
мыддоринтэм/d
мылмы-кыдмы/d
мытӥсь/d
накас/dp
нарсуд/d
небыльток/dp
нефтяник/d
нин/d
норд/d
нукыртон/d
нылдусым/d
нырултон/d
нюжтӥськись/d
нюромон/d
обедатьтон/d
общность/d
ожалъян/d
октос/d
опонькагуби/d
ортчытъяськон/d
отпускной/pd
ӧвӧлмытон/d
ӧтем/d
паймытылон/d
пальккаськылон/d
пант/d
парма/d
паспортист/d
пачылскем/d
пеймытатон/d
пеньӟо/d
перигелий/d
печатка/d
пилемъёс/d
пирожки/d
пичиёмытъян/d
плащ/d
пограллян/d
подписка/d
показатель/d
полушубок/d
порошок/d
поттон/d
пӧрмытъян/d
пӧяськись/d
преступление/d
проводка/d
просек/d
пугырлы/d
пуконтӥ/d
пульсаллян/d
пуныноны/d
пурон/d
пушмульы/dp
пыдсаськон/d
пыктон/d
пыриськылон/d
пышикуж/d
радиотрансляция/d
ранец/d
режиссёр/d
реформизм/d
рудник/d
сазьяллян/d
салкым/dp
сапкем/d
саюлскон/d
сектаськись/d
середа/d
сётон-басьтон/d
силач/d
синмаськем/d
сириец/d
сӥтьбӧчы/d
словарь/d
сокан/d
спичка/d
стратосфера/d
сузькон/d
сунэран/d
сурттэм/d
сыномылон/d
сьӧм/d
сюанбер/d
сюр/d
сямлык/d
такапиос/d
тапкетон/d
текстура/d
технология/d
тӥялтэм/d
тодылэм-адӟылэм/d
тордытъян/d
тӧлатъян/d
тракторчи/d
трофей/d
туён/d
тулка/d
тунгус/dp
турнась/d
тыласькон/d
тыриськон/d
тэбет/d
тэтчась-турын/d
тяпыртон/d
удъяськон/d
узбечка/d
уйиськись/d
уктылон/d
улошоятӥськон/d
умоятон/d
урдсӥнтон/d
урок/d
усыясь/d
утчаськон-бугыръяськон/d
ушъян/d
фермент/d
фонд/d
халтура/d
хроника/d
чабкос/d
чакласькылон/d
чарака/d
чек/d
черлан/d
чибис/d
чилектон/d
чипсылон/d
чортылон/d
чукдор/d
чуньыкыӵ/d
чусон/d
чырткемъяськытон/d
ӵектӥськем/d
ӵоксаськем/d
ӵужапа/d
ӵушиськылон/d
ӵыжы-выжы/d
шаертодон/d
шальтшорт/dp
шаулан/d
шелепатон/d
шестерня/d
шлюз/d
шоналтылон/d
шорткук/d
шӧмъятылон/d
шуатон/d
шузияськытон/d
шульыртон/d
шупатъян/d
шуял/pd
шыр/dp
щур/d
ымйылон/d
ысъян/d
эгол/dp
экспонат/d
электросӥс/d
эне/d
эркеяллян/d
этажерка/d
юбилей/dp
юзматскон/d
юнматьян/d
юрттылон/d
ягмульыятон/d
яранлык/d
